Hawaii statutes.
§461J-10 Biennial renewal; failure to renew.
(a) The biennial renewal fee shall be paid to the
department of commerce and consumer affairs on or before December 31 of each
even-numbered year. Failure, neglect, or refusal of any licensee to pay the
biennial renewal fee on or before such date shall constitute a forfeiture of
the license.

(b) A forfeited license may be restored upon
written application within one year from the date of forfeiture, provision
of proof of completion of the required continuing competence units, and
the payment of the delinquent fee plus an amount equal to fifty per cent of the
delinquent fee. [L 1985, c 276, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 35, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next